Maine, session 132, LD733.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
The Maine State Housing Authority is conducting a pilot project to facilitate rent
payment history reporting to credit reporting agencies for purposes of establishing or
improving the credit ratings of low-income residential tenants. The authority will provide
the results of the pilot project, including data regarding the effectiveness of collecting and
reporting rent payment histories, to the Legislature no later than the Second Regular
Session of the 132nd Legislature. This bill proposes to make changes to the law based on
the results of the pilot project.
Page 1 - 132LR0665(01)